Washington statutes.
RCW 41.48.160

Political subdivisions—Sick leave payments—Adoption of accounting plan and payroll procedures.

A political subdivision of the state may, pursuant to ordinance or resolution, adopt an accounting plan and payroll procedures sufficient to meet the requirements of federal statutes and regulations and the department of health, education, and welfare for the purpose of excluding payments made on account of sickness, from the meaning of "wages" under federal old age and survivors' insurance.

[ 1979 c 152 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 152: See note following RCW 41.48.120.